Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-2203
Grant; application; ethanol infrastructure project; eligibility for grant.

(1) A person shall be eligible to apply for a grant under the program if the person is an owner or operator of a retail motor fuel site.

(2) An ethanol infrastructure project shall be eligible for a grant under the program if such project is:

(a) Designed and used exclusively to store and dispense E-15 gasoline or E-85 gasoline or a blend of ethanol and gasoline from a motor fuel pump designed to blend such motor fuels together in blends higher than E-15. Such E-15 gasoline shall be a registered fuel recognized by the United States Environmental Protection Agency;

(b) On the premises of a retail motor fuel site; and

(c) Subject to a cost-share agreement as described in section 66-2205.

(3) An ethanol infrastructure project shall not be eligible for a grant under the program if such infrastructure includes a tank vehicle.

Laws 2019, LB585, § 3.